Missouri, session 2026, HB3182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.635, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 115.635, to read as follows:
115.635. 1. The following offenses, and any others specifically so described by law,
shall be class three election offenses and are deemed misdemeanors connected with the
exercise of the right of suffrage. Conviction for any of these offenses shall be punished by
imprisonment of not more than one year or by fine of not more than two thousand five
hundred dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine:
(1) Giving, lending, agreeing to give or lend, offering, promising, or endeavoring to
procure, any money or valuable consideration, office, or place of employment, to or for any
voter, to or for any person on behalf of any voter, or to or for any person, in order to induce
any voter to vote or refrain from voting or corruptly doing any such act on account of such
voter having already voted or refrained from voting at any election;
(2) Making use of, or threatening to make use of, any force, violence, or restraint, or
inflicting or threatening to inflict any injury, damage, harm or loss upon or against any
person, in order to induce or compel such person to vote or refrain from voting at any
election;
(3) Impeding or preventing, or attempting to impede or prevent, by abduction, duress
or any fraudulent device or contrivance, the free exercise of the franchise of any voter or, by
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3182 2
abduction, duress, or any fraudulent device, compelling, inducing, or prevailing upon any
voter to vote or refrain from voting at any election;
(4) Giving, or making an agreement to give, any money, property, right in action, or
other gratuity or reward, in consideration of any grant or deputation of office;
(5) Bringing into this state any nonresident person with intent that such person shall
vote at an election without possessing the requisite qualifications;
(6) Asking for, receiving, or taking any money or other reward by way of gift, loan, or
other device or agreeing or contracting for any money, gift, office, employment, or other
reward, for giving, or refraining from giving, his or her vote in any election;
(7) Removing, destroying or altering any supplies or information placed in or near a
voting booth for the purpose of enabling a voter to prepare his or her ballot;
(8) Entering a voting booth or compartment except as specifically authorized by law;
(9) On the part of any election official, challenger, watcher or person assisting a
person to vote, revealing or disclosing any information as to how any voter may have voted,
indicated that the person had voted except as authorized by this chapter, indicated an intent to
vote or offered to vote, except to a grand jury or pursuant to a lawful subpoena in a court
proceeding relating to an election offense;
(10) On the part of any registration or election official, refusing to permit any person
to register to vote or to vote when such official knows the person is legally entitled to register
or legally entitled to vote;
(11) Attempting to commit or participating in an attempt to commit any class one or
class two election offense;
(12) Threatening to harm or engaging in conduct reasonably calculated to harass
or alarm, including stalking under section 565.227, an election judge, challenger,
watcher, or employee or volunteer of an election authority, or a member of such person's
family;
(13) Attempting to induce, influence, deceive, or pressure an election official or
member of an election official's family to violate any provision of this chapter;
(14) Disseminating, through any means, including by posting on the internet, the
home address, home telephone number, mobile telephone number, personal email
address, social security number, federal tax identification number, checking account
number, savings account number, credit card number, marital status, or identity of a
child under eighteen years of age, of an election judge, challenger, watcher, or employee
or volunteer of an election authority, or a member of such person's family, for the
purposes listed in subdivisions (12) and (13) of this section.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term "election official" includes the
election authority for the county, election judges, and other volunteers or employees of

HB 3182 3
an election authority. If a violation of subdivision (12), (13), or (14) of subsection 1
results in death or bodily injury to an election official or a member of the official's
family, the offense shall be a class B felony.
✔